Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Amendment of Articles of Incorporation

Law reviews. —

For article, “Capital Margin Concept and Wyoming Corporation Law,” see VII Wyo. L.J. 117 (1953).

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 185 (1961).

For article, “Corporate Expression in Wyoming Ballot Issues, Referenda and Initiatives: A Political and Legal Dilemma,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 449 (1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

18 Am. Jur. 2d Corporations §§ 78 to 99.

18 C.J.S. Corporations §§ 45 to 61.

§ 17-16-1001.
Authority to amend.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles of incorporation as of the effective date of the amendment or to delete a provision that is not required to be contained in the articles of incorporation.

A shareholder of the corporation does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the articles of incorporation, including provisions relating to management, control, capital structure, dividend entitlement or purpose, or duration of the corporation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), substituted “as of the effective date of the amendment or to delete a provision that is not required to be contained” for “or to delete a provision not required” in the first sentence, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles of incorporation is determined as of the effective date of the amendment.”

Cited

in

Skane v. Star Valley Ranch Ass'n, 826 P.2d 266,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 17-16-1002.
Amendment before issuance of shares.

If a corporation has not yet issued shares, its board of directors, or its incorporators if it has no board of directors, may adopt one (1) or more amendments to the corporation’s articles of incorporation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “board of directors, or its incorporators if it has no board of directors” for “incorporators or board of directors”.

Editor's note. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-1003.
Amendment by board of directors and shareholders.

If a corporation has issued shares, an amendment to the articles of incorporation shall be adopted in the following manner:

The proposed amendment shall be adopted by the board of directors;

Except as provided in W.S.

17-16-1005

,

17-16-1007

and

17-16-1008

, after adopting the proposed amendment the board of directors shall submit the amendment to the shareholders for their approval. The board of directors shall also transmit to the shareholders a recommendation that the shareholders approve the amendment, unless the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation in which case the board of directors shall transmit the basis for that determination to the shareholders;

The board of directors may condition its submission of the amendment to the shareholders on any basis;

If the amendment is required to be approved by the shareholders and the approval is to be given at a meeting, the corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the shareholders’ meeting at which the amendment is to be submitted for approval. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the amendment and shall contain or be accompanied by a copy of the amendment;

Unless the articles of incorporation, or the board of directors acting pursuant to paragraph (iii) of this subsection require a greater vote or a greater number of shares to be present, approval of the amendment requires the approval of the shareholders at a meeting at which a quorum exists, and, if any class or series of shares is entitled to vote as a separate group on the amendment, except as provided in W.S. 17-16-1004(c), the approval of each such separate voting group at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group exists.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3; 2012, ch. 98, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to action without meeting, see §

17-16-704

.

As to waiver of notice, see §

17-16-706

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the former section, which read: “(a) A corporation's board of directors may propose one (1) or more amendments to the articles of incorporation for submission to the shareholders.

“(b) For the amendment to be adopted:

“(i) The board of directors shall recommend the amendment to the shareholders unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders with the amendment; and

“(ii) The shareholders entitled to vote on the amendment shall approve the amendment as provided in subsection (e) of this section.

“(c) The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposed amendment on any basis.

“(d) The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance with W.S.

17-16-705

. The notice of meeting shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed amendment and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment.

“(e) Unless this act, the articles of incorporation, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (c) of this section require a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, the amendment to be adopted shall be approved by:

“(i) A majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the amendment by any voting group with respect to which the amendment would create dissenters' rights; and

“(ii) The votes required by W.S.

17-16-725

and

17-16-726

by every other voting group entitled to vote on the amendment.”

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “paragraph (iii) of this subsection” for “subsection (c) of this section” in (a)(v).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

Editor's note. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Corporate Expression in Wyoming Ballot Issues, Referenda and Initiatives: A Political and Legal Dilemma,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 449 (1979).

§ 17-16-1004.
Voting on amendments by voting groups.

If a corporation has more than one (1) class of shares outstanding, the holders of the outstanding shares of a class are entitled to vote as a separate voting group, if shareholder voting is otherwise required by this act, on a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation if the amendment would:

Effect an exchange or reclassification of all or part of the shares of the class into shares of another class;

Effect an exchange or reclassification, or create the right of exchange, of all or part of the shares of another class into shares of the class;

Change the rights, preferences, or limitations of all or part of the shares of the class;

Change the shares of all or part of the class into a different number of shares of the same class;

Create a new class of shares having rights or preferences with respect to distributions or to dissolution that are prior or superior to the shares of the class;

Increase the rights, preferences, or number of authorized shares of any class that, after giving effect to the amendment, have rights or preferences with respect to distributions or to dissolution that are prior or superior to the shares of the class;

Limit or deny any existing preemptive right of all or part of the shares of the class; or

Cancel or otherwise affect rights to distributions that have accumulated but not yet been authorized on all or part of the shares of the class.

If a proposed amendment would affect a series of a class of shares in one (1) or more of the ways described in subsection (a) of this section, the holders of shares of that series are entitled to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed amendment.

If a proposed amendment that entitles two (2) or more classes or series of shares to vote as separate voting groups under this section would affect those two (2) or more classes or series in the same or a substantially similar way, the holders of shares of all the classes or series so affected shall vote together as a single voting group on the proposed amendment, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or required by the board of directors.

A class or series of shares is entitled to the voting rights granted by this section although the articles of incorporation provide that the shares are nonvoting shares.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the introductory language of (a), added “If a corporation has more than one (1) class of shares outstanding,” and “to the articles of incorporation”; deleted former (a)(i), which read: “Increase or decrease the aggregate number of authorized shares of the class;” and redesignated the remaining paragraphs accordingly; deleted “designation” after “Change the” in (a)(iii); deleted “or substantially equal” after “superior” in (a)(v) and (vi); in (a)(viii), deleted “or dividends” after “distributions,” and substituted “authorized” for “declared”; added “holders of” in (b); in (c), added “classes or” wherever it appears, added “holders of,” and added “unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or required by the board of directors”; and made related changes.

Editor's note. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-1005.
Amendment by board of directors.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a corporation’s board of directors may adopt amendments to the corporation’s articles of incorporation without shareholder approval:

To extend the duration of the corporation if it was incorporated at a time when limited duration was required by law;

To delete the names and addresses of the initial directors;

To delete the name and address of the initial registered agent or registered office, if a statement of change is on file with the secretary of state;

If the corporation has only one (1) class of shares outstanding:

To change each issued and unissued authorized share of the class into a greater number of whole shares of that class; or

To increase the number of authorized shares of the class to the extent necessary to permit the issuance of shares as a share dividend.

To change the corporate name by substituting the word “corporation,” “incorporated,” “company,” “limited,” or the abbreviation “corp.,” “inc.,” “co.,” or “ltd.,” for a similar word or abbreviation in the name, or by adding, deleting, or changing a geographical attribution for the name;

To reflect a reduction in authorized shares, as a result of the operation of W.S. 17-16-631(b), when the corporation has acquired its own shares and the articles of incorporation prohibit the reissue of the acquired shares;

To delete a class of shares from the articles of incorporation, as a result of the operation of W.S. 17-16-631(b), when there are no remaining shares of the class because the corporation has acquired all shares of the class and the articles of incorporation prohibit the reissue of the acquired shares; or

To make any change expressly permitted by W.S. 17-16-602(a) or (b) to be made without shareholder approval.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the introductory language of (a), deleted “one (1) or more” after “may adopt,” and substituted “approval” for “action to”; rewrote (a)(iv), which read: “(iv)
Change each issued and unissued authorized share of an outstanding class into a greater number of whole shares if the corporation has only shares of that class outstanding;”; added (a)(vi) and (vii), and redesignated former (a)(vi) to be (a)(viii); in (a)(viii), substituted “W.S. 17-16-602(a) or (b)” for “this act,” and “approval” for “action”; and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

The paragraphs in this section have been renumbered to more closely align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.
The two do not align completely as the numbering system of the Model Act is different from Wyoming Statutes under W.S.

8-1-105

, which is required by the 2009 law to be followed in the renumbering process.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-1006.
Articles of amendment.

After an amendment to the articles of incorporation has been adopted and approved in the manner required by this act and by the articles of incorporation, the corporation shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment adopted;

If an amendment provides for an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of issued shares, provisions for implementing the amendment if not contained in the amendment itself which may be made dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the articles of amendment;

The date of each amendment’s adoption; and

If an amendment:

Was adopted by the incorporators or board of directors without shareholder approval, a statement that the amendment was duly approved by the incorporators or by the board of directors as the case may be and that shareholder approval was not required; or

Required approval by the shareholders, a statement that the amendment was duly approved by the shareholders in the manner required by this act and by the articles of incorporation;

Reserved.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 2.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2; 2010, ch. 82, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote the introductory language of (a), which read: “A corporation amending its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment setting forth:”; added “which may be made dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the articles of amendment” in (a)(iii); rewrote (a)(v), which read: “If an amendment was adopted by the incorporators or board of directors without shareholder action, a statement to that effect and that shareholder action was not required; and”; added (a)(v)(B); and made related changes.

The 2010 amendment,

repealed former (a)(vi), which read: “If an amendment was approved by the shareholders: (A) The designation, number of outstanding shares, number of votes entitled to be cast by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the amendment, and number of votes of each voting group indisputably represented at the meeting; and (B) Either the total number of votes cast for and against the amendment by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the amendment or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the amendment by each voting group and a statement that the number cast for the amendment by each voting group was sufficient for approval by that voting group.”

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-16-1007.
Restated articles of incorporation.

A corporation’s board of directors may restate its articles of incorporation at any time with or without shareholder approval, to consolidate all amendments into a single document.

If the restated articles include one (1) or more new amendments requiring shareholder approval, the amendments shall be adopted and approved as provided in W.S.

17-16-1003

.

A corporation restating its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of restatement setting forth the name of the corporation and the text of the restated articles of incorporation together with a certificate which states that the restated articles consolidate all amendments into a single document and, if a new amendment is included in the restated articles, which also includes the statements required under W.S.

17-16-1006

.

Duly adopted restated articles of incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments to them.

The secretary of state may certify restated articles of incorporation, as the articles of incorporation currently in effect, without including the certificate information required by subsection (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “approval, to consolidate all amendments into a single document” for “action” in (a); rewrote (b), which read: “The restatement may include one (1) or more amendments to the articles. If the restatement includes an amendment requiring shareholder approval, it shall be adopted as provided in W.S.

17-16-1003

.”; repealed former (c), which read: “If the board of directors submits a restatement for shareholder action, the corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance with W.S.

17-16-705

. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed restatement and contain or be accompanied by a copy of the restatement that identifies any amendment or other change it would make in the articles”; and rewrote former (d), which read: “(d) A corporation restating its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of restatement setting forth the name of the corporation and the text of the restated articles of incorporation together with a certificate setting forth:

“(i) Whether the restatement contains an amendment to the articles requiring shareholder approval and, if it does not, that the board of directors adopted the restatement; or

“(ii) If the restatement contains an amendment to the articles requiring shareholder approval, the information required by W.S.

17-16-1006

.”; and redesignated former (d) as (c).

Editor's note. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-1008.
Amendment pursuant to court-ordered reorganization.

A corporation’s articles of incorporation may be amended without action by the board of directors or shareholders to carry out a plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by a court of competent jurisdiction under the authority of a law of the United States.

The individual or individuals designated by the court shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment approved by the court;

The date of the court’s order or decree approving the articles of amendment;

The title of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

A statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under federal statute.

This section does not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceeding even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “the authority of a law of the United States” for “federal statute if the articles of incorporation after amendment contain only provisions required or permitted by W.S.

17-16-202

” in (a); and repealed former (c), which read: “Shareholders of a corporation undergoing reorganization do not have dissenters' rights except as and to the extent provided in the reorganization plan.”

Editor's note. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-1009.
Effect of amendment.

An amendment to articles of incorporation does not affect a cause of action existing against or in favor of the corporation, a proceeding to which the corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than shareholders of the corporation. An amendment changing a corporation’s name does not abate a proceeding brought by or against the corporation in its former name.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.